Hawaii statutes.
[§431:3A-205]
Revised privacy notices. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this
article, a licensee shall not, directly or through an affiliate, disclose any
nonpublic personal financial information about a consumer to a nonaffiliated
third party other than as described in the initial notice that the licensee
provided to that consumer under section 431:3A-201, unless:

(1) The licensee has provided to the consumer a clear
and conspicuous revised notice that accurately describes its policies and
practices;

(2) The licensee has provided to the consumer a new
opt out notice;

(3) The licensee has given the consumer a reasonable
opportunity, before the licensee discloses the information to the nonaffiliated
third party, to opt out of the disclosure; and

(4) The consumer does not opt out.

(b) If a
licensee is required to deliver a revised privacy notice under subsection (a),
the licensee shall deliver it in accordance with section 431:3A-206. [L 2001, c
220, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next